Washington statutes.
RCW 35.59.100

Prior proceedings validated and ratified.

All proceedings which have been taken prior to the date this chapter takes effect for the purpose of financing or aiding in the financing of any work, undertaking or project authorized in this chapter by any municipality, including all proceedings for the authorization and issuance of bonds and for the sale, execution and delivery thereof, are hereby validated, ratified, approved and confirmed, notwithstanding any lack of power (other than constitutional) of such municipality or the legislative body or officers thereof to authorize and issue such bonds, or to sell, execute, or deliver the same and notwithstanding any defects or irregularities (other than constitutional) in such proceedings.

[ 1967 c 110 s 10.]